text/hyphen/dictionaries/sq_al.dic
# No hyphenation between digraphs
l6l
r6r
s6h
d6h
g6j
t6h
x6h
z6h
n6j
# Hyphenate between consecutive vowels
a7a4
a7e4
a7ë4
a7i4
a7o4
a7u4
a7y4
e7a4
e7e4
e7ë4
e7i4
e7o4
e7u4
e7y4
ë7a4
ë7e4
ë7ë4
ë7i4
ë7o4
ë7u4
ë7y4
i7a4
i7e4
i7ë4
i7i4
i7o4
i7u4
i7y4
o7a4
o7e4
o7ë4
o7i4
o7o4
o7u4
o7y4
u7a4
u7e4
u7ë4
u7i4
u7o4
u7u4
u7y4
y7a4
y7e4
y7ë4
y7i4
y7o4
y7u4
y7y4
# Hyphenate between consecutive same letters 
a7a
b7b
c7c
ç7ç
d7d
dh7dh
e7e
ë7ë
f7f
g7g
gj7gj
h7h
i7i
j7j
k7k
ll7ll
m7m
n7n
nj7nj
o7o
p7p
q7q
rr7rr
s7s
sh7sh
t7t
th7th
u7u
v7v
x7x
xh7xh
y7y
z7z
zh7zh
# Hyphenate ending of common noun/adjective inflections
7je.
7mja.
7shmja.
7shëm.
7shme.
7shmja.
7shmit.
3të.
ue7si.
ue7sin.
ue7sit.
ye7si.
ye7sin.
ye7sit.
# No hyphenation for single syllable words
.sht4o4n.
.nd4y4.
.mb4i4.
.xh4u4xh.
.l4u4s.
.k4u4rd.
.ng4u4t.
.s4e4ç.
.xh4i4p.
.m4a4n.
.fl4e4.
.g4e4mth.
.pl4e4ng.
.g4ë4rb.
.zgj4e4bç.
.br4u4ssh.
.4y4ll.
.gj4o4rm.
.shv4i4c.
.skr4a4pth.
.mj4a4ft.
.zhv4i4ll.
.pl4u4mbth.
.gr4i4ll.
.r4e4ç.
.p4u4c.
.kl4e4n.
.n4e4sh.
.q4o4kth.
.ç4e4p.
.c4e4p.
.shkr4i4m.
.gd4a4nsl.
.p4i4rg.
.m4u4t.
.mb4u4dhsh.
.nd4a4l.
.krr4a4.
.s4y4z.
.ç4u4ç.
.shq4o4fsh.
.4a4ks.
.z4o4t.
.ngr4i4tsh.
.zb4u4s.
.br4o4nk.
.sh4a4t.
.m4a4rr.
.wh4o4.
.4e4ns.
.h4o4vsh.
.c4u4kssh.
.spr4a4pssh.
.b4u4ks.
.t4o4.
.l4i4nç.
.j4e4p.
.sp4o4t.
.pr4e4t.
.s4e4k.
.skr4a4p.
.ngr4i4sh.
.th4e4rsh.
.d4a4l.
.fr4u4q.
.ngj4i4z.
.skll4o4p.
.p4e4rm.
.shp4o4rr.
.pr4e4k.
.zdr4i4tsh.
.sht4u4f.
.th4a4rk.
.zh4i4r.
.l4a4sht.
.k4o4rr.
.ll4a4k.
.ft4o4.
.4e4st.
.rr4o4sh.
.çn4e4.
.pr4e4fsh.
.sk4e4ç.
.th4e4lb.
.shkr4i4n.
.nx4i4sh.
.g4i4ps.
.br4y4dh.
.4i4l.
.gll4u4p.
.rr4e4zg.
.dh4e4lsh.
.xh4e4t.
.vj4e4rdhsh.
.nd4i4ç.
.tr4e4.
.h4i4dh.
.sh4e4mb.
.tr4i4.
.b4o4nz.
.c4o4n.
.pl4a4f.
.h4a4s.
.r4a4jt.
.p4i4pth.
.n4e4js.
.j4o4t.
.fj4e4t.
.nd4a4j.
.shpr4u4sh.
.4a4d.
.gj4i4ps.
.4u4db.
.nj4e4hsh.
.sht4y4p.
.sh4u4rrsh.
.th4i4thsh.
.s4o4t.
.h4a4m.
.4e4rz.
.4a4m.
.h4a4psh.
.krr4o4k.
.q4a4f.
.tr4u4sh.
.l4e4j.
.rr4e4fsh.
.gr4a4hsh.
.l4o4b.
.ç4a4l.
.v4e4l.
.m4a4tsh.
.q4o4sh.
.j4e4m.
.h4a4jt.
.pr4o4zh.
.n4e4m.
.pj4e4rdhsh.
.4e4j.
.gj4a4k.
.sht4o4j.
.ll4o4f.
.vr4e4t.
.q4e4m.
.sht4y4sh.
.sh4e4f.
.g4a4c.
.v4i4s.
.c4a4.
.4a4rs.
.shk4o4p.
.sm4a4lt.
.br4i4t.
.tr4e4n.
.4u4jq.
.kr4o4s.
.pl4a4k.
.r4i4.
.4a4q.
.d4y4nd.
.4e4ndth.
.çm4i4m.
.k4a4llp.
.p4a4q.
.sk4o4rr.
.lv4o4v.
.k4e4.
.mbr4e4tsh.
.k4a4.
.q4u4ksh.
.h4u4p.
.ç4a4st.
.h4o4.
.shk4a4l.
.mb4a4jt.
.çmpl4e4ks.
.vl4e4j.
.br4a4kt.
.r4y4s.
.pr4o4r.
.çj4e4rrsh.
.r4o4mb.
.zv4o4l.
.s4i4sh.
.tr4a4nd.
.4i4.
.ngr4e4dh.
.zgr4a4p.
.tr4a4ndsh.
.bl4u4z.
.mb4a4n.
.t4y4pth.
.b4e4.
.4a4rrç.
.mb4a4th.
.pr4a4n.
.tr4e4sh.
.k4o4nt.
.th4e4k.
.çm4o4s.
.z4e4shksh.
.sk4ë4rc.
.ngr4e4hsh.
.b4u4jk.
.shpl4e4kssh.
.v4e4n.
.k4u4nd.
.m4a4jm.
.st4u4rm.
.r4i4ng.
.p4i4sk.
.t4i4rk.
.s4u4rbsh.
.br4a4n.
.p4u4d.
.k4i4csh.
.f4e4.
.sh4a4sh.
.mp4o4sht.
.zhb4ë4j.
.ps4i4.
.m4a4jmsh.
.4u4sh.
.sht4a4lp.
.h4y4fsh.
.z4u4ç.
.l4e4s.
.sh4a4j.
.q4y4rsh.
.pll4u4m.
.sh4o4sh.
.b4a4rt.
.kll4u4k.
.m4a4jth.
.c4e4m.
.shq4i4t.
.tr4a4th.
.shp4e4jt.
.h4u4psh.
.h4u4mbsh.
.rr4i4tsh.
.çmbl4e4dh.
.n4e4f.
.t4u4rq.
.z4a4r.
.f4o4m.
.sl4a4b.
.kr4e4zm.
.v4a4l.
.4a4rdhsh.
.pr4e4h.
.p4i4kssh.
.zg4o4r.
.gr4u4p.
.zhv4i4sh.
.gr4o4g.
.m4u4sh.
.tr4e4t.
.br4u4s.
.kr4y4dh.
.n4e4t.
.shkr4ë4nd.
.b4a4c.
.th4o4pç.
.g4u4fsh.
.shm4e4.
.4i4ksh.
.g4u4ç.
.m4a4jn.
.sh4e4k.
.t4a4st.
.f4e4kssh.
.pt4u4.
.ft4o4njsh.
.b4u4j.
.4i4b.
.ç4o4j.
.zdr4ë4nk.
.ç4u4n.
.mbr4u4sh.
.tr4u4.
.br4e4dhsh.
.x4i4ng.
.fl4o4ks.
.vl4a4k.
.j4a4ht.
.r4i4mth.
.4a4ksh.
.f4u4gsh.
.zhb4ë4.
.q4u4ll.
.s4e4lf.
.dh4a4.
.vl4o4fsh.
.fr4a4q.
.kr4i4r.
.f4ë4t.
.l4i4ng.
.l4i4k.
.mbr4o4thsh.
.c4ë4rc.
.4u4çk.
.zll4o4t.
.4e4rr.
.ng4a4s.
.p4u4thsh.
.ç4o4k.
.l4u4m.
.q4a4n.
.kr4o4n.
.pr4i4ll.
.v4e4nd.
.k4u4ng.
.shp4o4.
.4a4rgsh.
.sht4a4t.
.m4u4shq.
.k4e4dh.
.sp4i4.
.k4e4psh.
.ng4o4p.
.b4u4z.
.r4e4.
.gj4e4n.
.shk4ë4mbth.
.zb4u4r.
.mb4i4n.
.kr4a4jl.
.v4i4t.
.s4o4p.
.k4ë4.
.v4u4rf.
.çmp4i4n.
.k4o4ç.
.k4a4ps.
.sht4e4g.
.4u4l.
.4u4c.
.zhb4ë4fsh.
.b4u4rth.
.k4o4n.
.shkr4y4dh.
.mb4a4rssh.
.4u4jk.
.n4e4z.
.br4e4n.
.q4e4lq.
.c4i4mbsh.
.st4o4m.
.dr4e4jt.
.dh4e4mbsh.
.gr4i4j.
.l4u4l.
.zb4e4n.
.t4e4l.
.s4a4n.
.br4u4c.
.d4u4f.
.p4y4ll.
.zhg4u4n.
.k4e4rrn.
.b4a4ht.
.rr4e4h.
.k4o4m.
.ll4a4f.
.pl4e4ks.
.p4u4sh.
.br4u4kth.
.gn4o4m.
.shkr4e4t.
.v4ë4rc.
.l4a4rsh.
.m4i4kth.
.4a4j.
.l4o4sh.
.t4o4rk.
.g4a4th.
.zb4u4t.
.fr4i4ksh.
.v4e4rr.
.rrj4e4t.
.4e4t.
.f4e4ndsh.
.sh4i4n.
.mbr4i4nj.
.cp4u4th.
.b4e4nd.
.j4e4vgj.
.ll4u4r.
.mbr4o4.
.br4o4nz.
.4e4psh.
.l4ë4sh.
.pl4u4s.
.zgj4i4ç.
.vd4i4q.
.çm4a4llsh.
.zgrr4o4jc.
.k4a4rdh.
.mp4a4ksh.
.zhgr4e4h.
.shb4a4.
.br4y4dhsh.
.h4a4d.
.zj4a4rrth.
.mp4i4fsh.
.t4o4r.
.dr4a4.
.mb4y4tsh.
.c4y4tsh.
.m4o4r.
.fl4u4r.
.fr4ë4ng.
.h4e4dh.
.b4a4rdh.
.l4a4g.
.d4o4l.
.nd4e4fsh.
.shq4i4mth.
.sk4u4qsh.
.b4a4lç.
.t4y4mth.
.f4a4p.
.q4y4p.
.4u4sht.
.zhb4ë4n.
.k4u4rs.
.f4i4ks.
.p4u4lt.
.tr4e4s.
.gj4e4shk.
.b4u4rgth.
.shk4e4lm.
.h4o4v.
.h4u4lm.
.4u4jkth.
.dr4i4n.
.r4e4shtsh.
.k4ë4rrk.
.g4a4kth.
.ç4i4k.
.br4i4.
.k4a4psh.
.tr4e4nd.
.sq4o4h.
.p4a4fsh.
.kr4i4.
.p4u4ls.
.4y4sht.
.b4a4rkth.
.ng4i4n.
.b4i4s.
.p4a4c.
.z4i4.
.k4o4r.
.nd4e4n.
.fl4i4sh.
.rr4o4t.
.sq4u4k.
.n4u4nc.
.xh4e4rr.
.q4a4r.
.f4o4r.
.shq4i4msh.
.c4u4p.
.ç4ë4njt.
.k4a4gj.
.q4e4psh.
.t4u4rp.
.d4y4sh.
.p4o4n.
.t4e4mp.
.m4o4ps.
.sp4a4t.
.d4o4t.
.f4a4l.
.d4y4st.
.f4o4n.
.r4u4ssh.
.r4u4c.
.zbr4i4t.
.c4a4f.
.s4e4nd.
.çd4o4.
.l4i4gsht.
.k4u4k.
.c4i4mb.
.shp4e4t.
.rr4e4shksh.
.gj4e4p.
.4e4hsh.
.sh4u4r.
.h4i4mn.
.d4e4t.
.ç4a4sh.
.br4e4shk.
.v4i4r.
.xh4a4n.
.h4e4q.
.p4ë4r.
.ndj4e4n.
.k4i4.
.w4e4b.
.p4u4q.
.k4e4qsh.
.v4a4kt.
.th4e4th.
.c4o4f.
.mb4y4t.
.p4i4s.
.shk4o4n.
.r4i4n.
.shp4a4j.
.j4a4r.
.bl4o4g.
.dhj4e4t.
.c4i4tsh.
.dr4u4th.
.shk4i4t.
.gr4e4k.
.f4u4shk.
.g4a4nf.
.ps4a4lt.
.zd4a4t.
.v4a4fsh.
.fsh4i4.
.zhb4e4nd.
.l4i4n.
.4u4nd.
.b4u4ng.
.mbr4o4n.
.f4e4ks.
.d4e4ng.
.ml4y4sh.
.pr4i4tsh.
.t4u4fk.
.mbr4y4dhsh.
.fsh4e4hsh.
.m4u4.
.fl4a4s.
.k4e4rr.
.zgj4o4fsh.
.f4a4ls.
.q4y4q.
.h4y4n.
.ng4i4t.
.t4ë4nd.
.dh4e4n.
.b4i4shtth.
.g4y4p.
.t4u4sh.
.l4y4m.
.sh4o4k.
.m4u4ndsh.
.rr4a4ssh.
.4a4r.
.kr4i4s.
.l4i4st.
.v4o4dh.
.ç4i4rr.
.b4ë4zz.
.grr4a4c.
.sp4i4k.
.gr4e4n.
.4a4.
.pj4e4rrk.
.p4a4.
.zh4a4ll.
.l4o4c.
.t4a4k.
.4e4c.
.j4o4d.
.ndr4i4.
.zb4i4m.
.4a4lç.
.z4o4gj.
.bl4i4.
.m4a4rdhsh.
.k4u4mb.
.t4i4r.
.mb4a4rt.
.q4o4rrth.
.ç4o4.
.skr4o4p.
.sh4u4rdh.
.4a4t.
.s4a4nk.
.b4y4l.
.k4a4llsh.
.nd4i4shk.
.zb4a4rdhç.
.shq4e4psh.
.shtr4i4fsh.
.shfr4e4.
.mb4a4thsh.
.shkr4e4h.
.h4e4rr.
.n4o4m.
.p4o4nt.
.l4a4b.
.l4i4gjsh.
.br4u4m.
.nx4ë4sh.
.k4o4d.
.t4a4l.
.l4a4pssh.
.d4i4l.
.gj4e4t.
.sm4o4g.
.sht4y4psh.
.dj4a4lth.
.zgj4e4dh.
.k4e4m.
.k4a4rst.
.m4ë4r.
.f4i4l.
.zb4a4rdh.
.m4a4.
.v4ë4.
.ç4y4sht.
.p4a4m.
.f4a4ng.
.m4o4rth.
.p4a4s.
.p4a4t.
.pl4a4zh.
.k4o4lt.
.shtrr4a4k.
.p4i4q.
.gj4o4k.
.vr4u4ll.
.zhgrr4y4s.
.4o4kb.
.nd4ë4rr.
.p4u4s.
.z4u4.
.m4i4ll.
.h4a4ssh.
.s4u4rb.
.dh4e4s.
.ngr4o4hsh.
.zhd4ë4psh.
.k4ë4nd.
.v4a4rg.
.p4e4t.
.q4i4t.
.n4i4s.
.xh4a4z.
.br4u4t.
.çmp4i4fsh.
.nd4e4r.
.zhdr4y4j.
.c4e4.
.t4u4z.
.zb4e4j.
.b4a4ç.
.q4u4kth.
.shtr4i4n.
.d4e4l.
.k4u4q.
.c4a4ll.
.f4ë4ng.
.m4u4r.
.sm4a4g.
.ngr4y4ssh.
.vr4i4n.
.4a4f.
.g4u4lm.
.ngj4a4k.
.skr4o4dh.
.k4i4c.
.zdr4u4kth.
.knj4a4z.
.mr4e4t.
.k4u4mt.
.k4u4qsh.
.ndr4y4dhsh.
.sh4u4rr.
.q4i4p.
.th4e4s.
.bl4a4z.
.zg4ë4q.
.sht4o4g.
.f4i4rn.
.pr4e4s.
.shtr4o4fsh.
.k4ë4rp.
.sht4o4fsh.
.km4e4r.
.vdj4e4rr.
.sh4e4nj.
.g4a4tsh.
.kr4o4m.
.kr4o4l.
.zhdr4y4n.
.s4o4s.
.v4a4g.
.p4o4d.
.mp4i4j.
.b4e4l.
.kth4e4.
.gl4i4f.
.p4e4c.
.4y4b.
.dr4e4sh.
.kr4a4nth.
.f4a4kt.
.ng4e4c.
.c4a4k.
.ndr4i4j.
.fr4y4.
.çng4u4l.
.shkr4ë4ndsh.
.d4a4rk.
.r4u4p.
.sh4e4lg.
.xh4e4l.
.br4e4sh.
.zb4a4thsh.
.4o4r.
.p4e4lq.
.ft4o4fsh.
.ll4o4ksh.
.mpr4e4hsh.
.sp4i4sh.
.k4a4mp.
.z4i4t.
.gr4o4ll.
.p4a4ks.
.4a4nkth.
.c4i4p.
.shtr4a4p.
.m4u4g.
.t4o4pth.
.str4u4p.
.sht4ë4ng.
.b4e4lg.
.t4e4.
.nx4i4t.
.l4i4ndsh.
.sk4i4sh.
.s4e4.
.ng4o4rdhsh.
.j4a4.
.b4ë4s.
.pr4e4dk.
.q4e4n.
.shp4i4fsh.
.mbr4u4s.
.r4a4st.
.c4u4kth.
.pr4a4g.
.shkr4o4lc.
.sh4e4s.
.sh4ë4n.
.grr4e4c.
.zgj4i4sh.
.4ë4h.
.4a4c.
.p4o4q.
.b4u4.
.f4i4n.
.sh4u4j.
.gr4e4psh.
.b4o4sh.
.shkr4i4.
.kr4ë4nd.
.p4o4st.
.sh4e4.
.br4u4ç.
.p4u4k.
.gj4e4j.
.h4e4rc.
.z4ë4.
.s4i4tsh.
.h4i4n.
.sk4i4rr.
.s4i4t.
.d4e4ll.
.j4o4v.
.rr4e4ksh.
.vr4a4p.
.t4e4kst.
.l4a4ç.
.t4ë4t.
.kr4i4psh.
.gl4o4b.
.4a4ft.
.h4e4p.
.c4u4ksh.
.4ë4njt.
.r4u4r.
.nd4u4ksh.
.l4u4t.
.z4i4nj.
.sh4a4p.
.r4u4csh.
.pr4i4nç.
.pl4a4h.
.mbr4e4j.
.kthj4e4llsh.
.zb4o4.
.s4u4lt.
.fsh4i4h.
.d4a4r.
.sp4a4r.
.z4a4m.
.fr4y4n.
.shfr4y4n.
.rrj4e4p.
.dhj4a4msh.
.k4a4rl.
.shq4i4nd.
.th4i4nj.
.zbr4u4n.
.k4e4k.
.b4y4rsh.
.dr4u4.
.n4e4rv.
.c4e4rk.
.cj4e4p.
.c4u4k.
.ngr4o4h.
.m4e4sh.
.s4i4lf.
.t4y4ç.
.k4i4j.
.v4i4ç.
.dj4e4msh.
.b4e4g.
.f4e4rr.
.w4i4ld.
.fr4e4n.
.fsh4i4k.
.r4u4s.
.zb4o4j.
.r4e4jms.
.t4o4g.
.krr4u4p.
.4a4shkth.
.pr4i4mn.
.dr4i4ll.
.st4a4d.
.c4i4ng.
.st4i4lb.
.br4a4msh.
.p4u4f.
.h4o4c.
.rr4ë4t.
.ç4i4l.
.h4o4ng.
.ps4a4lsh.
.tr4o4ç.
.dr4o4m.
.shpr4e4h.
.m4e4hr.
.ç4u4ll.
.4a4shk.
.t4i4s.
.d4e4r.
.m4e4n.
.zhb4i4n.
.z4o4gth.
.d4ë4ng.
.zbr4e4s.
.sh4a4fsh.
.sh4ë4rpth.
.n4o4.
.sh4u4lc.
.fr4ë4ngj.
.t4e4rsh.
.h4a4n.
.h4i4psh.
.4o4fsh.
.r4e4nc.
.p4o4ç.
.g4u4f.
.f4y4t.
.m4e4s.
.s4u4p.
.kr4i4p.
.gr4y4m.
.sp4a4ç.
.sk4e4m.
.m4a4rrsh.
.b4u4lk.
.zgl4o4q.
.sm4i4rth.
.vj4e4t.
.shk4u4lsh.
.pl4i4sh.
.çm4o4n.
.m4a4jnc.
.f4o4ks.
.br4a4k.
.shkr4e4l.
.k4ë4rc.
.r4ë4ndsh.
.gj4e4rgj.
.c4u4rr.
.th4e4ksh.
.j4e4s.
.ft4o4h.
.s4a4ç.
.n4o4t.
.kl4i4p.
.dr4y4.
.d4e4rt.
.q4ë4.
.zm4a4lt.
.p4u4p.
.kl4o4s.
.shk4u4l.
.gr4e4pth.
.pr4a4ps.
.gdh4e4ndsh.
.dhr4i4m.
.vj4e4ll.
.tr4i4ps.
.d4e4rr.
.k4o4s.
.zb4e4h.
.ndr4i4t.
.m4o4rs.
.4e4ng.
.4u4j.
.ng4u4tsh.
.4e4rg.
.p4o4ll.
.shk4o4pth.
.v4ë4ng.
.tr4u4pth.
.ng4u4s.
.p4e4rs.
.b4u4shk.
.mb4y4ll.
.shth4e4m.
.h4u4rb.
.shkr4i4j.
.t4y4.
.mj4a4k.
.s4e4mt.
.sq4u4ll.
.ndr4e4q.
.zbr4u4k.
.çl4o4dh.
.p4i4ksh.
.th4o4nj.
.h4a4k.
.k4a4lth.
.v4e4rdhsh.
.ngj4o4k.
.gj4e4sh.
.4a4ht.
.ll4a4z.
.shkr4a4p.
.tr4a4k.
.zbl4o4k.
.tr4u4ng.
.fq4i4nj.
.sh4ë4t.
.str4u4c.
.tr4i4r.
.sh4a4h.
.sm4u4qth.
.d4i4ng.
.shnd4u4k.
.ft4i4k.
.kl4o4sh.
.m4a4t.
.sht4i4p.
.pr4i4nxh.
.s4u4lm.
.q4e4.
.h4o4ll.
.v4e4sk.
.gj4e4dh.
.sn4o4b.
.c4y4thsh.
.mp4i4ks.
.k4u4dh.
.nx4i4j.
.zhd4u4k.
.b4i4m.
.k4ë4rç.
.sk4i4t.
.x4i4x.
.tr4o4mb.
.m4i4t.
.zg4a4l.
.b4i4.
.dj4e4pth.
.shk4e4l.
.bl4e4jsh.
.l4y4th.
.b4e4lb.
.br4i4sk.
.mb4y4llsh.
.ngj4a4ll.
.m4u4sht.
.ndr4y4ssh.
.m4u4nk.
.l4i4gsh.
.r4a4ng.
.gr4a4msh.
.br4i4tm.
.g4e4.
.d4o4k.
.ng4ë4rth.
.shf4a4q.
.prr4a4r.
.dr4i4th.
.t4a4ft.
.fj4o4rd.
.b4u4n.
.s4a4jt.
.fr4e4sk.
.g4u4sh.
.m4y4kth.
.k4e4ç.
.shl4u4k.
.k4u4.
.l4i4nd.
.ç4a4rt.
.dr4a4ft.
.4u4n.
.c4a4c.
.dj4e4.
.4a4kth.
.kl4o4n.
.v4a4th.
.m4ë4k.
.f4i4q.
.sf4o4ksh.
.k4y4.
.m4a4l.
.v4a4ls.
.j4u4g.
.vr4e4r.
.ngr4y4k.
.p4e4r.
.pr4a4sk.
.dhj4a4k.
.h4a4sm.
.gr4e4c.
.bll4o4k.
.shk4u4nd.
.ndr4y4.
.nd4i4h.
.p4u4nkt.
.g4e4m.
.mj4e4t.
.vj4e4shk.
.q4y4t.
.sht4u4k.
.th4e4fsh.
.sh4a4z.
.k4u4rm.
.shp4o4sh.
.t4u4tsh.
.m4u4ch.
.c4i4rk.
.k4o4b.
.t4o4p.
.skrr4a4.
.pl4u4t.
.k4a4f.
.zb4y4th.
.p4e4tk.
.shk4a4rp.
.fl4i4q.
.j4a4l.
.nk4e4qsh.
.rrj4e4psh.
.b4u4zm.
.kj4o4.
.c4i4ngth.
.m4o4l.
.shp4a4rr.
.ft4o4j.
.h4i4ç.
.kl4o4r.
.k4o4j.
.fl4e4t.
.shtr4y4dh.
.zg4o4rç.
.ng4i4.
.q4o4s.
.b4a4s.
.f4a4j.
.k4u4rth.
.sm4a4t.
.q4e4tsh.
.t4i4k.
.s4o4ssh.
.ng4a4th.
.mb4u4dh.
.r4a4jh.
.t4u4rk.
.sh4e4njsh.
.s4a4j.
.sh4y4t.
.pr4i4nd.
.shk4u4p.
.gj4e4mb.
.4u4h.
.ng4a4thsh.
.c4u4b.
.ngj4a4fsh.
.s4y4sk.
.f4o4b.
.4a4llc.
.k4a4pth.
.q4y4r.
.shp4u4rdh.
.tr4e4mbsh.
.shk4o4q.
.çmbl4e4dhsh.
.l4i4nsh.
.shtr4e4k.
.vr4u4g.
.s4o4l.
.kl4i4k.
.m4a4rsh.
.ng4a4.
.v4e4j.
.zdj4e4rg.
.s4e4rb.
.4ë4.
.ndr4y4shk.
.l4u4gth.
.shkr4i4mb.
.t4a4kssh.
.ks4a4nt.
.kr4i4mb.
.n4ë4n.
.l4o4s.
.s4e4ks.
.shth4u4rsh.
.l4o4z.
.w4a4sh.
.f4i4sh.
.b4a4z.
.q4u4llsh.
.gr4i4ndsh.
.shp4i4m.
.zh4a4rg.
.th4e4r.
.zb4e4sh.
.spr4a4ps.
.kr4i4pth.
.ng4u4q.
.l4y4psh.
.b4i4r.
.ç4a4psh.
.shkr4e4hsh.
.dh4e4mb.
.br4u4n.
.m4o4s.
.b4u4nj.
.gj4o4ks.
.k4u4sht.
.4o4p.
.st4e4l.
.d4e4h.
.dh4e4sk.
.k4a4lb.
.4u4.
.rr4o4k.
.q4y4rk.
.n4e4.
.f4a4n.
.bj4e4rr.
.v4o4c.
.l4e4h.
.4y4st.
.rr4u4dhsh.
.m4a4kth.
.m4i4kst.
.p4e4n.
.h4u4.
.k4o4t.
.sq4e4pth.
.zb4u4rth.
.n4a4m.
.pj4e4ll.
.nd4o4ll.
.shfr4y4.
.b4e4ft.
.h4y4j.
.n4ë4m.
.shtr4e4mb.
.skll4u4psh.
.v4e4lsh.
.tr4i4l.
.sht4e4rsh.
.pl4u4mbç.
.4a4h.
.mb4a4s.
.zhb4i4sh.
.sk4o4ç.
.m4a4j.
